Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
General Provisions

196.020.
Department of Corrections — Commissioner. [Repealed.]

196.025.
Delegation of authority by commissioner to deputy. [Repealed.]

196.026.
Organizational units of Department of Corrections.

The Department of Corrections shall consist of the following organizational units:

Personnel Division;

Office of Adult Institutions, which shall have the following divisions:

Division of Operations and Program Services;

Division of Medical Services;

Division of Mental Health Services;

Division of Substance Abuse Programming;

Division of Correctional Industries;

Division of Kentucky State Reformatory;

Division of Luther Luckett Correctional Complex;

Division of Roederer Correctional Complex;

Division of Blackburn Correctional Complex;

Division of Kentucky Correctional Institution for Women;

Division of Northpoint Training Center Division;

Division of Eastern Kentucky Correctional Complex;

Division of Bell County Forestry Camp;

Division of Kentucky State Penitentiary;

Division of Western Kentucky Correctional Complex;

Division of Green River Correctional Complex;

Division of Little Sandy Correctional Complex;

Division of Southeast State Correctional Complex; and

Division of Education.

Office of Community Services and Facilities, which shall have the following divisions:

Division of Probation and Parole;

Division of Reentry; and

Division of Local Facilities; and

Office of Support Services, which shall have the following divisions:

Division of Administrative Services;

Division of Corrections Training;

Division of Population Management; and

Division of Parole and Victim Services.

Each division specified in paragraphs (f) to (r) of this subsection shall be headed by a warden pursuant to KRS 196.160;

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 227, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 217, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 71, § 10, effective June 24, 2003; 2007, ch. 85, § 222, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 72, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 184, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 191, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 82, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

196.030.
Functions of Department of Corrections.

The department shall, unless otherwise provided by law, exercise all functions of the state in relation to:

Management of penal, reform, and correctional institutions;

Supervision of probation and parole;

The giving of assistance to other departments, agencies, and institutions of the state and federal government when requested by performing services in conformity with this section;

Acting as the agent of the federal government in matters of mutual concern, and in the administration of any federal funds granted to the state to aid in the performance of any function of this department;

Administration and enforcement of the provisions of KRS Chapter 441 relating to the development and enforcement of jail standards, training of jailers and jail personnel, and jail planning and construction.

Notwithstanding other provisions to the contrary, the Department of Corrections may contract with a county fiscal court or local or regional correctional authority to house misdemeanants and persons awaiting trial or sentencing.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any institution, home, or agency which does not receive aid from the state, a county, or municipality.

History.
4618-101: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 157, § 6; 1962, ch. 106, Art. X, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 385, § 29, effective July 1, 1982; 1990, ch. 497, § 15, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 19, effective July 14, 1992.

196.031.
Employment of personnel — Annual report.

The cabinet shall employ the personnel and operate and maintain data collection and processing systems necessary to comply with the provisions of this section.

The cabinet shall annually on July 1 of each year report to the Governor, the Legislative Research Commission, and the Kentucky State Corrections Commission on:

The placement of prisoners within the Commonwealth’s correctional system by institution, whether imprisoned in a state prison or other institution, including county jails, on probation, paroled, housed in halfway houses, housed in reentry centers, sentenced to community service or otherwise;

Numbers of prisoners by type of offense;

Numbers of prisoners by number and type of prior convictions;

Numbers of prisoners paroled by type of offense and by length of time served;

Numbers of prisoners released through shock probation by type of offense and by length of time served;

Numbers of prisoners serving their full sentence by type of offense;

The percentage of felony offenders on parole or some form of post-release supervision who are participating or completing treatment consistent with assessment results, in prison and in the community;

The percentage of felony offenders whose reassessment results demonstrate reductions in criminal risk factors;

The percentage of programs that demonstrate their effectiveness in reducing recidivism;

The percentage of felony offenders on parole or some form of post-release supervision, by supervision type, who:

Are employed or in school within thirty (30) days, six (6) months, and one (1) year of the start of supervision;

Have had part-time employment for a minimum of six (6) months, and the percentage of offenders who have had full-time employment for a minimum of six (6) months;

Have housing upon release from incarceration;

Had stable housing for at least six (6) months; and

Are arrested, convicted, or incarcerated within six (6) months, one (1) year, and three (3) years;

The percentage of admissions to prison by offenders under supervision at the time of admission, including information regarding whether the violations were criminal or technical; and

Any other data that provides information on state-funded crime reduction and recidivism reduction efforts, including caseload sizes by risk level, participation in treatment and intervention programming, public safety outcomes, and cost effectiveness.

The cabinet shall annually report to the Governor and to the Legislative Research Commission on:

Numbers and types of prison beds necessary to meet current population needs and six (6) year projections of those needs;

Current personnel needs of the cabinet and five (5) year projections of the needs; and

A six (6) year projection of needed capital construction, program development, and anticipated requests for appropriations.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 401, § 7, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 497, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 2003, ch. 71, § 11, effective June 24, 2003; 2011, ch. 2, § 65, effective June 8, 2011; 2017 ch. 158, § 90, effective June 29, 2017.

196.032.
Department’s objectives.

The primary objectives of the department shall be to maintain public safety and hold offenders accountable while reducing recidivism and criminal behavior and improving outcomes for offenders under its supervision. The department shall create and implement policies and programs to achieve these objectives.

History.
Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 2, effective June 8, 2011.

196.035.
Powers and duties of secretary.

The secretary shall, except as otherwise provided in KRS 439.250 to 439.560 and KRS Chapter 13A, have the power and authority to promulgate administrative regulations he or she deems necessary or suitable for the proper administration of the functions of the cabinet or any division in the cabinet, including qualification for the receipt of federal funds and for cooperation with other state and federal agencies. The secretary may delegate to any person appointed the power and authority as he or she deems reasonable and proper for the effective administration of the cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 157, § 8; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 13, § 10, effective July 14, 1992; 2007, ch. 85, § 223, effective June 26, 2007.

196.037.
Department personnel to have powers of peace officers.

All personnel of the department, while acting for the department in any capacity entailing the maintenance of custody over any prisoners, shall have all the authority and powers of peace officers.

All department personnel who are officially requested by a law enforcement agency in a county of Kentucky or by the Department of Kentucky State Police to assist in the apprehension of a prisoner who has escaped from the legal or physical custody of the Department of Corrections or a detention facility of the Department of Corrections shall possess, while responding to and for the duration of the matter for which the request was made, the same powers of arrest as peace officers.

Probation and parole officers, while acting for the department in any capacity entailing the maintenance of custody or supervision of any confined prisoner, paroled prisoner, escaped prisoner, probationer, or other person otherwise placed under their supervision shall have all the authority and powers of peace officers.

Internal affairs officers and supervisors of the department, while investigating any person in connection with an offense involving personnel of the department, employee of any contractor providing services to the department, confined prisoner, paroled prisoner, escaped prisoner, probationer, or other person otherwise placed under the supervision of the department, shall have all the authority and powers of peace officers.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 106, Art. X, § 8; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 497, § 19, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 20, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 335, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 334, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 345, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 85, § 224, effective June 26, 2007; 2015 ch. 126, § 1, effective June 24, 2015.

196.040.
Divisions of department. [Repealed.]

196.042.
Criminal justice reinvestment fund — Annual funds appropriations — Dedicated use of funds.

The criminal justice reinvestment fund is created as a trust fund. The trust fund shall consist of funds deposited pursuant to KRS 196.044 and shall be appropriated for the purposes set forth in subsection (3) of this section. The department shall administer the fund.

Any interest earned on moneys in the fund shall become a part of the fund and shall not lapse.

All funds in the criminal justice reinvestment fund shall be appropriated ninety (90) days after the close of the fiscal year as follows:

Twenty percent (20%) to the department for expanding and enhancing evidence-based substance use disorder treatment programs for inmates;

Twenty percent (20%) to the Office of Drug Control Policy for expanding and enhancing evidence-based substance use disorder treatment programs, including but not limited to treatment for neonatal abstinence syndrome;

Twenty percent (20%) to the crime victims’ compensation fund established in KRS 49.480;

Twenty percent (20%) to the department for reentry services, including but not limited to vocational training; and

Twenty percent (20%) to the community corrections fund established in KRS 196.732.

For programs that receive funding under subsection (3) of this section, the moneys appropriated pursuant to this section shall not be used to replace any other state or county appropriations that the programs would have received if not for the appropriation made pursuant to this section.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 158, § 100, effective June 29, 2017.

196.044.
Annual calculations of cost savings resulting from 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 158 — Deposit in criminal justice reinvestment fund.

As used in this section:

“Cost savings” means the ending balance excluding any necessary government expenses as identified in an enacted appropriations bill and any agency transfers that occurred in the same fiscal year from which an ending balance is realized;

“Criminal justice reinvestment fund” means the fund established in KRS 196.042; and

“Ending balance” means the remaining general fund moneys unexpended for the fiscal year in which those funds were appropriated by the General Assembly.

Beginning with the close of fiscal year 2017-2018 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall measure and document cost savings based on an ending balance created as a result of 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 158. Calculations shall be based on the department’s overall general fund appropriation. Measured and documented cost savings shall be reinvested and appropriated as provided in KRS 196.042.

Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any cost savings calculated pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall not lapse but shall be deposited by the department into the criminal justice reinvestment fund.
(3) (a)

Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any cost savings calculated pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall not lapse but shall be deposited by the department into the criminal justice reinvestment fund.

If no cost savings are calculated pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, no funds shall be deposited into the criminal justice reinvestment fund.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 158, § 99, effective June 29, 2017.

196.045.
Administrative regulations for restoration of civil rights to eligible felony offenders.

The Department of Corrections shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement a simplified process for the restoration of civil rights to eligible felony offenders. As part of this simplified process, the Department of Corrections shall:

Inform eligible offenders about the process for restoration of civil rights and provide a standard form which individuals may sign upon their release to formally request that the Department of Corrections initiate the process;

Generate a list on a monthly basis of eligible offenders who have been released by the Department of Corrections or discharged by the Parole Board and who have requested that their civil rights be restored;

Conduct an investigation and compile the necessary information to ensure that all restitution has been paid and that there are no outstanding warrants, charges, or indictments;

Provide notice to the Commonwealth’s attorney in the county of commitment and to the Commonwealth’s attorney in the offender’s county of residence, setting out in the notification the criminal case number and charges for which the offender was convicted; and

Forward information on a monthly basis of eligible felony offenders who have requested restoration of rights to the Office of the Governor for consideration of a partial pardon.

As used in this section, “eligible felony offender” means a person convicted of one (1) or more felonies who:

Has reached the maximum expiration of his or her sentence or has received final discharge from the Parole Board;

Does not have any pending warrants, charges, or indictments; and

Had paid full restitution as ordered by the court or the Parole Board.

As used in this section, “civil rights” means the ability to vote, serve on a jury, obtain a professional or vocational license, and hold an elective office. It does not include the right to bear arms.

Any eligible offender not provided for under subsection (2) of this section may submit an application directly to the Department of Corrections to initiate the process outlined in subsection (1) of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 115, § 1, effective June 21, 2001.

196.050.
Division of Public Assistance. [Repealed.]

196.060.
Division of Child Welfare. [Repealed.]

196.065.
Forensic psychiatric facility — Initiation of mental hospitalization proceedings against inmate.

The department shall operate a forensic psychiatric facility to provide mental health care for persons convicted of a crime who are committed to the department. This care shall be provided by the department for the duration of the person’s sentence.

The department shall initiate or be responsible for initiation of hospitalization proceedings under KRS Chapter 202A or 202B for any inmate who needs mental health care at the expiration of his sentence.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 295, § 45, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 113, § 12, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 227, § 4, effective July 15, 1994.

196.070.
Duties of commissioner of Department of Corrections — Training programs.

The commissioner of the Department of Corrections shall:

Supervise and administer the Kentucky State Reformatory, the Kentucky Correctional Institution for Women, the Kentucky State Penitentiary, Northpoint Training Center, the Luther Luckett Correctional Complex, the Eastern Kentucky Correctional Complex, the Green River Correctional Complex, the Western Kentucky Correctional Complex, the Roederer Correctional Complex, the Southeast State Correctional Complex, and any minimum security correctional institutions established and operated by the department, or any divisions of those institutions, the private prisons as provided by KRS 197.500, and the prison industry program within those institutions.

Supervise the employment of prisoners who have not been paroled or conditionally released, either within or without the walls or enclosures of these institutions.

Have the authority to transfer, with the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, appropriated funds from the budget of one (1) penal institution to another.

Determine minimum, maximum, and conditional release dates of prisoners in accordance with KRS 197.045.

Authorize the transfer of prisoners between institutions.

Create those positions and employ those personnel necessary to perform the functions of the department.

Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement KRS 196.700 to 196.735.

The commissioner may organize and maintain a training division for employees of the department and others and in connection therewith promulgate administrative regulations covering the course and conduct of the training and the period of time for which any employee or applicant therefor shall attend the school.

The Division of Corrections Training shall establish, supervise, and coordinate training programs and schools for corrections personnel, jail personnel, and any other justice or nonlaw-enforcement related personnel as prescribed by the secretary and shall issue certification to those employees having successfully met the requirements of the training program.

The Division of Corrections Training shall make a continuing study of corrections training standards and design, develop, and deliver preservice and in-service training programs.

The Division of Corrections Training shall, by administrative regulations, prescribe minimum qualifications for its instructors and shall approve, issue, or revoke the certification of instructors.

History.
4618-106: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 96, § 4; 1962, ch. 106, Art. X, § 5; subsection (4) repealed 1963 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 9; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(15), (19); 1974, ch. 308, § 37; 1978, ch. 155, §§ 41, 119, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 113, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 344, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 106, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 315, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 497, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 21, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 445, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 227, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 418, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 334, § 5, effective April 10, 1996; 2003, ch. 71, § 8, effective June 24, 2003; 2021 ch. 82, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.

196.073.
Governor’s authority to authorize commissioner to consent to transfer of convicted offenders under federal treaty.

If a treaty in effect between the United States and a foreign country provides for the transfer or exchange of convicted offenders to the country of which they are citizens or nationals, the Governor may, on behalf of the state and subject to the terms of the treaty, authorize the commissioner of the Department of Corrections to consent to the transfer of offenders and take any other action necessary to initiate the participation of the state in the treaty, upon application of the offender.

History.
Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 418, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

196.075.
Probation and parole functions.

The department, under the direction of the commissioner, shall exercise the functions vested in the department relating to probation and parole. The commissioner shall promulgate administrative regulations governing parolees and shall have the same powers of arrest as probation and parole officers.

History.
Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 96, § 5; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(15), (19); 1982, ch. 344, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 22, effective July 14, 1992; 2007, ch. 85, § 225, effective June 26, 2007.

196.076.
Probation and parole officer salary improvement program.

The department shall establish a probation and parole officer salary improvement program consisting of the following elements:

Probation and parole officer I with less than five (5) years of service shall receive no salary improvement.

Probation and parole officer II with five (5) but less than ten (10) years of service shall receive a salary improvement of five percent (5%).

Probation and parole officer III with ten (10) but less than fifteen (15) years of service shall receive a salary improvement of ten percent (10%).

Probation and parole officer IV with fifteen (15) or more years of service shall receive a salary improvement of ten percent (10%) or two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), whichever is less.

Salary improvements under this section shall be in addition to all other increments or other salary increases authorized by law but shall only be paid if the probation and parole officer has attained a favorable work-performance rating for four (4) of the previous five (5) years.

The service requirement shall be satisfied only by service as a Kentucky probation and parole officer.

At the time of implementation, officers who already meet the performance rating and service time requirements shall be awarded the respective position title and salary improvement. Officers who have not yet met those requirements shall be awarded the position title and salary improvements only upon meeting the requirements.

Probation and parole seniors, coordinators, and supervisors shall be included in the appropriate progression series level for salary improvement based upon the work performance rating and respective service time requirement attained. However, the progression series titles shall not apply to probation and parole seniors, coordinators and supervisors.

The department shall make the administrative regulations necessary for the administration of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 377, § 1, effective July 1, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 23, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 269, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

196.080.
Division of hospitals and mental hygiene. [Repealed.]

196.081.
Kentucky State Corrections Commission — Membership. [Repealed and reenacted.]

196.090.
Laboratory of criminal identification and statistics — Persons to cooperate with. [Repealed.]

196.091.
Online system based on state statistics of offenders for use in plea negotiations and sentencing.

The department shall develop an online system based on state statistics of actual offenders to provide courts, attorneys, probation and parole officers, and victims with objective information for use in plea negotiations and sentencing. The system shall include but not be limited to the following information:

Sentencing information for all felonies, including the amount of time likely to be served for particular offenses;

The offender’s risk assessment rating;

The offender’s expected time to serve, including but not limited to parole eligibility date, good time release date, maximum expiration of sentence date, and the historic percentage of time served for similar offenders;

The costs for various sentencing options and costs for various alternatives to incarceration; and

The offender’s likelihood of being reincarcerated within two (2) years under the different sentencing options and alternatives, taking into account the offender’s risk assessment rating.

History.
Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 67, effective July 1, 2013.

196.093.
Duties of Department of Corrections in regard to centralized criminal history record information system.

The Department of Corrections shall, in cooperation with the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the Administrative Office of the Courts, be responsible for the recording of those data elements that are needed for the development of the centralized criminal history record information system.

The database shall at a minimum contain the information required in KRS 27A.310 to 27A.440.

The Department of Corrections shall provide access to the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and the Administrative Office of the Courts to its database.

The Department of Corrections shall assign the same identification number or other variable to each person whose name appears in the database.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 41, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 606, § 19, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 169, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 226, effective June 26, 2007.

196.097.
Department of Corrections to update database within thirty days of receipt of information from certain levels.

The Department of Corrections shall update their own database within thirty (30) days of receipt of information. The update shall include information from the:

Offender level;

Institutional level; and

Informational and evaluational level.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 389, § 26, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 211, § 25, effective July 14, 1992.

196.099.
Photographic record of inmates.

The department shall maintain a photographic record of each inmate committed to its custody, regardless of where that inmate is housed, and shall update that record once every two (2) years. The photographic record may be taken and stored digitally.

History.
Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 15, § 1, effective June 21, 2001.

196.100.
Department to make rules for institutions for feeble-minded. [Repealed.]

196.110.
Department to study crime prevention methods — Encourage employment of inmates.

The department shall:

Study the sources and causes of crime, delinquency, and dependency and suggest and put into effect remedial measures in the prevention and ultimate eradication of antisocial acts and conditions; and

Encourage the employment of the inmates of the institutions under its control in such ways as will contribute to their physical, mental, and moral improvement and to meeting the cost of their maintenance. The department may utilize the product of inmate labor in the upkeep or maintenance of the respective institutions or for other departments of the state government, and may transfer from one (1) institution to another, or otherwise dispose of, any surplus products produced.

History.
216a-3, 216a-4: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 26, effective July 14, 1992.

196.111.
Evidence-based practices to be used in treatment and intervention programs — Standards — Funding restrictions.

As used in this section, “evidence-based practices” means supervision policies, procedures, treatment and intervention programs, and practices that scientific research demonstrates reduce recidivism among inmates and individuals on probation, parole, or other form of post-release supervision when implemented competently.

In order to increase the effectiveness of treatment and intervention programs funded by the state and provided by the department for inmates, probationers, and parolees, the department shall require that such programs use evidence-based practices.

The department shall measure the effectiveness of each treatment and intervention program and demonstrate that the program has a documented evidence base and has been evaluated for effectiveness in reducing recidivism.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations to provide, at a minimum:

A process for reviewing the objective criteria for evidence-based practices established by the agency providing the program;

A process for auditing the effectiveness of the program;

An opportunity for programs that do not meet the criteria based on the audit results to improve performance; and

A mechanism to defund any program that does not meet the criteria upon a second audit.

Beginning July 1, 2012, twenty-five percent (25%) of state moneys expended on programs shall be for programs that are in accordance with evidence-based practices. Beginning July 1, 2014, fifty percent (50%) of state moneys expended on programs shall be for programs that are in accordance with evidence-based practices. Beginning July 1, 2016, and thereafter, seventy-five percent (75%) of state moneys expended on programs shall be for programs that are in accordance with evidence-based practices.

By fiscal year 2016-2017, the department shall eliminate supervision policies, procedures, programs, and practices intended to reduce recidivism that scientific research demonstrates do not reduce recidivism. However, the department may utilize a new supervision policy, procedure, program, or practice if the department determines that the new supervision policy, procedure, program, or practice has the potential for qualifying as an evidence-based practice after more scientific research is conducted.

History.
Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 50, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 156, § 20, effective July 12, 2012.

196.120.
Department may acquire farm lands.

The Department of Corrections may lease or purchase farm lands, improved or unimproved, for the employment of the inmates of the institutions under its supervision. The Department of Corrections may prescribe administrative regulations for the support and maintenance of prisoners while at work on the farm, and may construct all necessary improvements on any lands purchased under this section.

Before land is leased, the lease shall first be approved by the Governor and the lease shall be limited to the term of the Governor approving it. The contract price of the lease shall be certified to the Finance and Administration Cabinet and paid as other claims against the state.

History.
216a-22: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1), Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 8, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 27, effective July 14, 1992.

196.130.
University to investigate lands that department wishes to acquire.

The University of Kentucky shall, at the request of the Department of Corrections, examine and report on any land which the Department of Corrections wishes to investigate with a view to purchase or lease, so that the Department of Corrections may be fully advised as to the quality and character of the soil, water supply, sanitation, and other agricultural and engineering problems. The university shall be entitled to receive its necessary expenses in connection with the investigation.

History.
216aa-34: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 9, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 28, effective July 14, 1992.

196.135.
Compliance with KRS 100.361(2) required, when.

If the state proposes to acquire, construct, alter, or lease any land or structure to be used as a penal institution or correctional facility, and the proposed use is contrary to or inconsistent with local planning regulations or local comprehensive plans, the commissioner shall comply with the requirements of KRS 100.361(2). Failure to comply shall cause any transaction respecting the acquisition, construction, alteration, or lease to become null and void.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 178, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 211, § 29, effective July 14, 1992.

196.140.
Condemnation by department.

When it is necessary for the department to own real estate for its use and it is unable to acquire the property by purchase, the department may condemn the real estate for its use and purposes in the manner set forth in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.
216aa-33: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1976, ch. 140, § 88; 1982, ch. 344, § 10, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 30, effective July 14, 1992.

196.150.
Department may use money received from federal government.

The Department of Corrections may accept money from the federal government, or any of its agencies, under any grant agreement entered into by the State of Kentucky or the Department of Corrections. The money may be expended for capital outlay in accordance with the provisions of KRS 56.440 to 56.550.

History.
216aa-25a: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 50, § 30; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(14); 1982, ch. 344, § 11, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 211, § 31, effective July 14, 1992.

196.160.
Appointment of personnel for each institution — Dress and grooming requirements — Contributions to hazardous duty retirement program — Career retention program.

The commissioner shall appoint a warden, a receiver, and other necessary employees for each of the state penal and correctional institutions. The compensation of these officers and employees may include maintenance. The commissioner may require these officers and employees to wear uniforms and to adopt, amend, or rescind administrative regulations governing dress and grooming standards of these uniformed officers and employees.

The department shall make the contributions required by KRS 61.592 for participation in the hazardous duty retirement program by its employees in those positions in state correctional institutions and the Kentucky Correctional Psychiatric Center with duties that regularly and routinely require face-to-face contact with inmates.

For those employees included in subsection (2) of this section and those whose primary workplace is a state correctional institution or the Kentucky Correctional Psychiatric Center, the department shall institute a career retention program, including salary improvements earned through extended time in qualifying public service. Salary improvements shall be effected by increasing the base salary of each employee in the career retention program by a set monthly amount after the employee’s completion of the first two (2), four (4), six (6), eight (8), and ten (10) years of employment served after, and not prior to, July 1, 2002. The amount of the base salary increase to be awarded an employee after the employee’s completion of a qualifying amount of public service under this subsection shall be as set out in the executive branch budget for each biennium following the 2002-2004 biennium in an amount calculated to recruit and retain qualified correctional personnel. Salary increases required by this subsection shall be in addition to any other increase authorized by law.

History.
216aa-8: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 50, § 31; 1958, ch. 126, § 25; 1962, ch. 106, Art. X, § 6; 1982, ch. 344, § 12, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 401, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 460, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 32, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 445, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 2002, ch. 219, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

196.165.
Purchase of liability insurance for department’s health care professionals.

The commissioner of the Department of Corrections may, with the approval of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, purchase liability insurance for the protection of health care professionals employed by or serving the department to protect them from liability for acts, omissions, and claims of medical and professional malpractice arising in the course and scope of their employment or service to the department.

The commissioner may purchase the type and amount of liability coverage deemed appropriate to best serve the department’s interest.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 445, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.